Utah statutes.
48-2a-702.   Assignment of partnership interest.
Except as provided in the partnership agreement, a partnership interest is
assignable in whole or in part.   Except as set forth in Subsection 48-2a-801
(4), an assignment of a partnership interest does not dissolve a limited
partnership or entitle the assignee to become or to exercise any rights of a
partner.  An assignment entitles the assignee to receive, to the extent
assigned, only the distribution to which the assignor would be entitled.
Except as provided in the partnership agreement, a partner ceases to be a
partner upon assignment of all of his partnership interest.
